Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-538
Compliance with act.

Any individual or business entity engaged in the business of abstracting in Nebraska shall comply with the Abstracters Act.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 1, p. 1436;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-509;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 477;

Laws 2002, LB 1071, § 2.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).